Nebraska, session 109, LB425.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB425 LB425
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3506 (1) All homesteads in this state shall be assessed for
taxation the same as other property, except that:
(a) There there shall be exempt from taxation, on any homestead
described in subdivision (2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) subsection
(2) of this section, one hundred percent of the exempt amount; and .
(b) There shall be exempt from taxation, on any homestead described
in subdivision (2)(g) of this section, a percentage of the exempt amount.
The percentage of the exempt amount shall be equal to the disability
percentage of the veteran of the homestead.
(2) The exemption described in subsection (1) of this section shall
apply to homesteads of:
(a) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of one hundred percent service-connected permanent
disability, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections
77-3526 to 77-3528;
(b) An unremarried surviving spouse of a veteran described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a surviving spouse of such a
veteran who remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(c) A veteran who was discharged or otherwise separated with a
characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions),
who is drawing compensation from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs because of one hundred percent service-connected temporary
disability, and who is not eligible for total exemption under sections
77-3526 to 77-3528, an unremarried spouse of such a veteran, or a
surviving spouse of such a veteran who remarries after attaining the age
of fifty-seven years;
(d) An unremarried surviving spouse of any veteran, including a
-2-

LB425 LB425
2025 2025
veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01, who was
discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or
general (under honorable conditions) and who died because of a service-
connected disability or a surviving spouse of such a veteran who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years;
(e) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman,
including a veteran other than a veteran described in section 80-401.01,
whose death while on active duty was service-connected or a surviving
spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who remarries after attaining
the age of fifty-seven years; and
(f) An unremarried surviving spouse of a serviceman or servicewoman
who died while on active duty during the periods described in section
80-401.01 or a surviving spouse of such a serviceman or servicewoman who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years; and .
(g) Beginning January 1, 2026, a veteran who was discharged or
otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general
(under honorable conditions), who is drawing compensation from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs because the veteran is at least
eighty percent disabled but less than one hundred percent disabled due to
a service-connected disability, and who is not eligible for total
exemption under sections 77-3526 to 77-3528, an unremarried surviving
spouse of such a veteran, or a surviving spouse of such a veteran who
remarries after attaining the age of fifty-seven years.
(3) Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(a) of this
section shall be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible by
five and shall include certification of the status described in
subdivision (2)(a) of this section from the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs. Application for exemption under subdivision (2)(b),
(c), (d), (e), or (f), or (g) of this section shall be required annually
and shall include certification of the status described in subdivision
(2)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f), or (g) of this section from the United
-3-

LB425 LB425
2025 2025
States Department of Veterans Affairs, except that such certification of
status shall only be required in every subsequent year evenly divisible
by five.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-3506, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-